inc/flattened/excel2fst/VTI.lexc
LEXICON VTI_am_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:anziinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:anziinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:anziininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:anziininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:anziinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:anziinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:anziinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:anziinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:anziini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:anziinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:anziini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:anziinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:anziinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:anziin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:anziinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:anziinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:anziinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:anziininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:anziininaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:anziininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:anziinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:anziinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:anziinaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:aanaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:aanaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:aaninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:aminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:aaninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:aminaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:aanaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:aanaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:aanaawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:aanaawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:aanini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:amini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:aanini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:amini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:aanan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:aan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:aanaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:aanaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:aanaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:aaninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:aaninaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:aaninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:aanaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:aanaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:aanaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_am_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_am_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_am_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwegwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziinigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwangen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwambanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziinigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziiwiingen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziweg # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzigwaa # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzinig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwaang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwang # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzing # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwegiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwegoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwamban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzigwaaban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzinigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzigoban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziwangiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:anzingiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowegwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaagwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:aminigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowangen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaambaanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowegibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowegobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowambanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaagobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:aminigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowangibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:owiingibanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowiingen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:ameg # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:aman # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaad # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:aminid # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:ang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amaang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amang # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:aming # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amaambaan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amegiban1 # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO/%0PlO:amamban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amowaapan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:aminipan # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:angiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amaangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO/%0PlO:amangiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+%0SgO/%0PlO:amingiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziigwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziinigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:anziigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amogwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:aminigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:amogoban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = i   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_i_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_i_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_i_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_i_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTI_i_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTI_i_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTI_i_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_i_gi_WB
0:%>%> VTI_i_gi_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_i_gi_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:siinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:siinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:siiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0PlO:minaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+%0SgO:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0PlO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+%0SgO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0PlO:naawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+%0SgO:naawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+%0SgO:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:minaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0PlO:minaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+%0SgO:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_i_ni_WB
0:%>%> VTI_i_ni_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_i_ni_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:siiminaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:siimin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:siiminaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:siiminaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0PlO:minaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+%0SgO:minaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0PlO:imin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+%0SgO:min # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+%0SgO:naaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:minaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0PlO:minaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+%0SgO:minaaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_i_o_WB
0:%>%> VTI_i_o_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_i_o_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:siininaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:siinaadog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaa # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:siini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:siinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:siini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:siinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:siin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:siinaawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:siinaawaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:siininaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:siininaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaabanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:siinaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:siinaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0PlO:ninaadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+%0SgO:ninaadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0PlO:naadogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+%0SgO:naadog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaa # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:ni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0PlO:nini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:ni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+%0SgO:nini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0PlO:nan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+%0SgO:n # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0PlO:naawaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO:naawaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:ninaabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0PlO:ninaabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO:ninaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:naabanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0PlO:naabaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO:naaban # ;

LEXICON VTI_i_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VTI_i_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VTI_i_NONE_Endings
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siigwaaban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:siinigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:siigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:gwaaban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+%0SgO/%0PlO:nigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+%0SgO/%0PlO:goban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VTI, Stem Type = oo   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VTI_oo_Subclass
+VTI:0 VTI_oo_Flags ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VTI_oo_NONE_WB ;
@R.Prefix.gi@ VTI_oo_gi_WB ;
@R.Prefix.ni@ VTI_oo_ni_WB ;
@R.Prefix.o@ VTI_oo_o_WB ;

LEXICON VTI_oo_o_WB
0:%>%> VTI_oo_o_Endings ;
